District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
16 act may be cited as the "Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 762, S.O. 23-01974,
17 Act of 2026."
18 Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
19 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code§ 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
20 and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-
21 201; D.C. Official Code§ 9-202.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the portion of the public alley
22 in Square 762, as shown on the Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. 23-01974, is unnecessary for
23 alley purposes and orders it closed, as shown on the Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. 23-01974,
24 with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. 23-01974.
25 Sec. 3. The ordering of the alley closure under section 2 is contingent upon the
26 satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official file for S.O. 23-01974.
27 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
28 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement prepared by the Chief Financial Officer as
29 the fiscal impact statement required by section 602( c )(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule
30 Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02 (c)(3)).
1

31 Sec. 5. Effective date.
32 This act shall take effect upon its approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
33 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
34 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
35 24, 1973 (87 Stat 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
36 Columbia Register.
2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: February 20, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation, the “Closing of a Portion of a Public
Alley in Square 762, S.O. 23-01974, Act of 2026”
(AE-26-067)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov

1 ___________________________
2 Chairman Phil Mendelson
3 at the request of the Mayor
4
5
6 A BILL
7
8 ________
9
10 IN THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
11
12 ________________
13
14 To order the closing of a portion of a public alley in Square 762 in Ward 6.
15
16 BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
17 act may be cited as the “Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 762, S.O. 23-01974,
18 Act of 2026.”
19 Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
20 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), the Council finds that the
21 portion of the public alley in Square 762, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 23-
22 01974, is unnecessary for alley purposes and orders it closed, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat
23 filed under S.O. 23-01974, with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed
24 under S.O. 23-01974.
25 Sec. 3. The ordering of the alley closure under section 2 is contingent upon the
26 satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official file for S.O. 23-01974.
27 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
28 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement prepared by the Chief Financial Officer as
29 the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of
30 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

31 Sec. 5. Effective date.
32 This act shall take effect upon its approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
33 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
34 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
35 24, 1973 (87 Stat 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
36 Columbia Register.
2

Delegated Action of the Executive Director
PROJECT NCPC FILE NUMBER
Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in 8458
Square 762 - S.O. 23-01974
224 2nd Street, SE NCPC MAP FILE NUMBER
1.12(44.40)45666
Washington, DC
ACTION TAKEN
SUBMITTED BY
Approve comments to the Council
District of Columbia Department of Buildings,
of the District of Columbia
Office of the Surveyor
REVIEW AUTHORITY
Advisory
Per DC Code § 9-202.02
The District of Columbia Department of Buildings, Office of the Surveyor. has submitted a proposed alley
closure for Commission review and comment. The proposed alley closure includes the dead-end portion of
an existing public alley system in Lots 823, 842, and 843 in Square 762. The alley is bounded
by Pennsylvania Avenue, SE to the north, 3rd Street, SE, C Street, SE, and 2nd Street, SE. The portion of
the public alley to be closed has a combined area of 3,500 square feet. The alley varies in width,
generally between 10 and 12 feet, and is not currently used or relied upon for any transportation
purpose. The alley is located within the original boundary of the L’Enfant City. The surrounding uses are
generally mixed-use with ground floor retail and residential above, with g overnment uses to the west.
The applicant, Clear Plains LLC, is proposing to close the alley in order to facilitate the renovation,
expansion, and adaptive reuse of the historic buildings on the site. The site will be combined into a single
lot of record along with the adjacent property located at 233 Pennsylvania Avenue, SE, and the existing
historic structures will be connected to create a single building for use by the new ownership. The ground
floor will include retail and entry to the office space above. The second floor will include office and event
space. The third floor will include event space. The rear of the structure will also house private event space,
which will open into an open courtyard in the center of the newly combined site. The development proposal
will be reviewed as a submission to the Zoning Commission.
Staff finds the project is not inconsistent with the relevant Comprehensive Plan policies contained in the
Historic Preservation and Urban Design Elements. The alley closing will not impact any federal properties,
nor any other identified federal interests. NCPC has an advisory review of alley closings, and therefore does
not have a responsibility under the National Historic Preservation Act or the National Environmental Policy
Act.
The Coordinating Committee reviewed the proposal at its April 12, 2023 meeting. Without objection, the
Committee forwarded the proposed comments to the Council of the District of Columbia to the
Commission with the statement that the proposal has been coordinated with most participating
agencies, including the General Services Administration, National Park Service, Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, the U.S. Commission of Fine Arts (CFA), DC State Historic
Preservation Office, District Department of Transportation, District Department of Energy and
Environment, and the DC Office of Planning (DCOP). The DCOP noted that they are not coordinating
yet since they have just received the proposal and are

Delegated Action of the Executive Director Page 2
NCPC File No. 8458
reviewing access impacts to adjacent properties. CFA staff noted that the Board of Zoning Adjustment had
previously reviewed a project at this site and had concerns.
Figure 1: Proposed Plat for Alley Closure on Square 762
Figure 2: Proposed Design

Delegated Action of the Executive Director Page 3
NCPC File No. 8458
* * *
Pursuant to delegations of authority adopted by the Commission on April 1, 2021 and per DC Code
§ 9-202.02, I find the proposed alley closing in Square 762, located in the block bounded by
Pennsylvania Avenue, SE, 3rd Street, SE, C Street, SE, and 2nd Street, SE in Washington, DC,
would not be inconsistent with the Federal Elements of the Comprehensive Plan for the National
Capital nor would it adversely affect any other federal interests.
for
04/27/202 3
Marcel Acosta Date
Executive Director

401 9th Street, NW North Lobby, Suite 500 Washington, DC 20004 Tel 202.482.7200 www.ncpc.gov
Commission Members IN REPLY REFER TO:
NCPC File No. 8458
Presidential Appointees
Teri Hawks Goodmann, Chair May 5, 2023
Bryan C. Green
Elizabeth M. Hewlett
Mr. Joseph Snider
District of Columbia Department of Buildings
Mayoral Appointees Office of the Surveyor
Arrington Dixon 1100 4th Street, SW
Linda Argo Washington, DC 20024
Dear Mr. Snider:
Ex Officio Members
Secretary of Defense
Pursuant to delegations of authority adopted by the Commission, I approved the comments to
The Honorable Lloyd J. Austin III
the Council of the District of Columbia for the Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square
Secretary of the Interior
The Honorable Deb Haaland 762 - S.O. 23-01974 located at 224 2nd Street, SE, Washington, DC. A copy of the Delegated
Administrator of General Services Action of the Executive Director is enclosed and available online at
The Honorable Robin Carnahan
www.ncpc.gov/review/archive/2023/5/ as part of the May 2023 meeting materials.
Chairman
Committee on Homeland Security
and Governmental Affairs Implementation of the project may require review by local agencies, including the issuance of
United States Senate
permits pursuant to regulations promulgated under the authority of federal environmental
The Honorable Gary C. Peters
statutes.
Chair
Committee on Oversight and Reform
U.S. House of Representatives
Sincerely,
The Honorable James Comer
Mayor
District of Columbia
The Honorable Muriel Bowser
Marcel Acosta
Chairman Executive Director
Council of the District of Columbia
The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Enclosures
Executive Director cc: Ms. Anita Cozart, Director, DC Office of Planning
Marcel Acosta Mr. Thomas Luebke, Secretary, U.S. Commission of Fine Arts

6801 Industrial Road
Springfield, Virginia 22151
April 13, 2023
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, S.W., Room E320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762 – S.O. 23-01974
Mr. Snider,
Our, consultant, ENTRUST Solutions Group, has reviewed the proposed public alley closures in
the subject location detailed in the attachments to the subject application filed by Holland & Knight. After
reviewing the area, it has been determined that Washington Gas does not have active natural gas
facilities within the limits of the proposed public alley closure which will be impacted by this proposal.
Washington Gas approves the Right of Way closure at this location.
Should you have any questions or concerns regarding these facilities, you may contact,
Johnathan Miller at:
ENTRUST Solutions Group
811 Pinnacle Drive, Suite Q
Linthicum Heights, Maryland 21090
jmiller@entrustsol.com
Office (606) 653-1417
Fax (630) 353-7777
Sincerely,
Fasica Negash
Washington Gas
Engineer, System Replacement
Fasica.nagash@washgas.com
Office: 571-562-0908
04/13/2023

Network Engineering
OPPE MD/DC
13101 Columbia Pike, FDC 1
Floor 1
Silver Spring, MD 20904
April 10th, 2023
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street SW
Washington, D.C. 20024
RE: Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762 – S.O. 23-01974
Dear Mr. Snider:
Location: Square 762
Verizon Washington D.C. Inc. objects to the proposal unless one of the two following are
done:
[ ] Service is no longer required in the Square.
[X ] An easement will be provided, and paid for by the owners with metes and bounds description with a plat and all
documentation necessary to record the easement to permit existing telephone plant to remain in its present location subject
to Verizon approval.
[ X ] Verizon is fully reimbursed for relocating its plant and feeders. Alley/Street closing will not take place until
these facilities are completely relocated and permanent services restored fully to all customers affected by the move.
[ ] Telephone cables and terminals are cut off and abandoned.
Very truly yours,
Kenneth D. Young
Engineer, Outside Plant Engineering, WSAM
KDY
c.c. D.C.D.O.T. Underground Location Section
Area Engineer
File

verizon
1/13/2025
Mr.RamonLabrador
Office of theSurveyor
1100 4"StreetSW
Washington,DC.
20024
Re: — ProposedClosingofa PublicAlleyinSquare762. S.023-01974
Dear Mr. Labrador
Verizon Washington D.C. Inc. does not objectto this Proposed Closingofa PublicAlley
based on its configuration now. However,any future redevelopmentthatrequires
Verizon to moveits facilities after the alleyis closedwill requirefull reimbursementto
Verizon forthis work.
Yourssincerely,
KennyYoung
Verizon OSP Engineering
Mgfog

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department of Public Works
Solid Waste Management Administration
MEMORANDUM
To: Diana Dorsey
Acting Chief Building Official
From: Reginald L. May
Associate Administrator SWMA, DPW
Subject: SUBJECT: Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762- S.R. 23-01974
Date: August 18th, 2023
This project will not cause a negative environmental impact if project developers and owners are
following applicable laws and regulations governing solid waste management during all phases of the
project.
District laws require that the property and the abutting public space be maintained free of litter, dust
management, and debris daily, and that all solid waste be properly containerized and removed at
sufficient frequency by a licensed solid waste Collector.
Should you have any questions you can contact me by email at; reginald.may2@dc.gov. I am available
by telephone on (202-645- 3900).

District of Columbia Office pepco.com
3400 Benning Road, NE
Washington, DC 20019
202-331-6237
June 2, 2023
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Department of Buildings
Office of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia
1100 4 Street, SW, Third Floor
th
Washington, DC 20024
Re: S.O. 23-01974
Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
In response to your Memorandum concerning the subject proposed Alley of closing square 762.
Pepco has reviewed the documents and comments as follows:
• PEPCO rejects this proposal.
• Further discussion required for PEPCO to reconsider since we have infrastructure in the
within the alley.
Sincerely,
Warren L. Spencer II, PE
Supervisor Designers
Phone: 240.797.3892
Email: warren.spencerii@exeloncorp.com
Engineering and Design– DC Engineering and Design – Mont. Co. Engineering and Design – PG Co.
3400 Benning Road, NE; Bldg. #59 201 West Gude Drive 8300 Old Marlboro Pike
Washington, DC 20019-1503 Rockville, Maryland 20850 Upper Marlboro, MD 20772
Tel: 202-331-6237/Fax: 202-388-2721 Tel: 301-670-8700/Fax: 301-670-8718 Tel:301-967-5800/Fax:301-967-5830

District of Columbia Office Montgomery County Office Prince George’s County Office
3400 Benning Road, NE 201 W. GudeDrive 8300 Old Marlboro Pike
Washington, DC 20019 Rockville, MD 20850 Upper Marlboro, MD 20772-2620
202-331-6237 301-670-8700 301-967-5800
November 21, 2024
Joseph E Snider
Department of Buildings
Office of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia
1100 4th Street, SW, Third Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Subject:Alley Closing
S.O 23 - 01974
Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider,
In response to your memorandum regarding the proposed alley closure in Square 762,
Pepco has reviewed the submitted documents and assessed the existing field
conditions. We will grant “Approval with Conditions” subject to the following
conditions:
1. Streetlight Removal Coordination: The applicant must collaborate with the
District of Columbia Department of Transportation (DDOT) to secure approval for
the removal of the streetlight fixture located in the alley. Pepco will not proceed
with de-energizing the streetlight until the required Streetlight Fixture Removal
(SLF) authorization is obtained from the DC Streetlight Department.
2. Service Coordination: The applicant must coordinate with Pepco Distribution
Engineering to address the existing metered service for the property at 203 Rear
3rd Street SE, Washington, DC.
Please ensure these conditions are addressed to facilitate the approval process. If you
have any questions or require further assistance, feel free to reach out.
Sincerely,
Name: Christopher Wilson
Title: Supervisor Designers – New Business DC
Pepco Engineering and Design
Phone (Office): (202) 428 - 1366
E-mail address: Christopher.Wilson4@exeloncorp.com

MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider, RLS, D.C. Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor
FROM: Crystal Myers, Development Review Specialist
JL
Joel Lawson, Associate Director Development Review
DATE: June 27, 2023
SUBJECT: S.O. 23-01974
Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762
I. RECOMMENDATION
The Office of Planning (OP) has completed its review of the application for the requested alley closing
and has no objection to the requested alley closure but is supportive of the DDOT’s objection to the
recordation of the alley closure plat until the Applicant satisfies the conditions in the DDOT report.
II. SITE DESCRIPTION
Applicant: Clear Plains LLC
Legal Description: Square 762, Lots 823, 842, 843
Ward / ANC: Ward 6 / ANC 6B
Zone: MU-26, which permits moderate density mixed use development
Historic District: Capitol Hill Historic District
Description: This stub-end portion of alley feeds into a broader alley system
that serves this square.
Size: The application indicates that the size of the alley to be closed is
about 918 square feet, and about 10 feet wide.
Adjacent Ownership: The adjacent lot is owned by the Heritage Foundation
Proposed Development: The project involves closing a segment of public alley to construct
three-story rear additions on the buildings at lot 842and 843 and a
two-story addition to the building at lot 823. These buildings along
with the adjacent building at lot 839, which is also owned by the
applicant but is not part of the application, would be connected to
create one large building. The new building would be on a new
record lot created from combining lots 842,843,823 and the
adjacent lot 839.
E650 – 1100 4th Street SW Washington, D.C. 20024 phone 202-442-7600, fax 202-535-2497
www.planning.dc.gov Find us on Facebook or follow us on Twitter @OPinDC

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 23-01974, Square 762
June 27, 2023 Page 2 of 6
III. REQUEST
Draft Plat of Proposed Alley Closing
IV. 24 DCMR Chapter 14 Requirements
Public Space and Safety
24 DCMR, Chapter 14, the street and alley closing regulations, requires submission of the following:
…
(d) A listing of all properties (land and buildings) associated with the proposed closing;
Lots 823, 842, and 843 in Square 762
(e) A listing of the name and location of each retail tenant that will be displaced because of the
demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or discontinuance of an existing building that is
associated with the closing;
Currently there are no retail tenants on the property.
24 DCMR § 1400.8 requires the site development plan to include the following so that reviewing
agencies can determine the potential impact of the requested closing:
(a) The Office of the Surveyor's application file number;
S.O. 23-01974

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 23-01974, Square 762
June 27, 2023 Page 3 of 6
(b) A key location sketch showing the development in relationship to the square and surrounding
streets, with the streets identified;
Provided.
(c) Footprint or outline of each building of the proposed development;
Provided.
(d) The street names;
Provided.
(e) The alley or street or portion thereof proposed to be closed; and the location and dimensions of
any dedication or easement proposed, along with a clear statement of the purposes for the
easement;
No easement is proposed. The location of the alley portion proposed for closure is shown.
(f) The approximate gross floor areas intended for various uses such as retail, office, residential,
industrial, and commercial;
Provided.
(g) The points of ingress and egress that vehicles will use for parking or loading purposes;
No parking or loading is required in this case because the proposed addition would be less than
50% of the historic buildings’ existing gross floor area, (Subtitle C§ 704).
(h) The location of off-street parking spaces and their number and size;
The site would retain some access to the remaining alley system, However, the applicant advised
OP that no off-street parking is required in this case because the proposed additions would be
less than 50% of the historic buildings’ existing gross floor area, (Subtitle C§ 704).
(i) The location and size of loading and unloading facilities such as berths, docks, and platforms;
(j) Tracking diagram for the maximum size trucks intended to use the loading and unloading
facilities;
The applicant advised OP that no loading is required in this case because the proposed additions
would be less than 50% of the historic buildings’ existing gross floor area, (Subtitle C§ 704).
(k) Elevation views for each side of any building proposed for the site; and
The submitted renderings provide a sufficient view of the proposed building additions.
(l) A profile drawing of the easement to clearly show the proposed surface grade of the easement
and the ceiling level of any building to be constructed over the easement.
No easement is proposed.
V. OP ANALYSIS
Planning and Urban Design
The Director of the Office of Planning is required to “determine whether the proposed closing is in
compliance with the District’s planning and urban design objectives”, as per 24 DCMR 1401.2(c).
The site is within an area designated on the Comprehensive Plan Future Land Use for Low Density
Commercial development, and on the Generalized Policy Map as a Main Street Mixed Use Corridor

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 23-01974, Square 762
June 27, 2023 Page 4 of 6
Area. The proposal is not inconsistent with these designations. It is also in general compliance with the
text of the Comprehensive Plan (10 DCMR), including when viewed through a racial equity lens.
Land Use Element
Policy LU-1.2.1: Sustaining a Strong District Center
Provide for the continued vitality of Central Washington as a thriving business, government, retail,
financial, hospitality, cultural, and residential center. Promote continued reinvestment in central
District buildings, infrastructure, and public spaces; continued preservation and restoration of historic
resources; and continued efforts to create safe, attractive, and pedestrian-friendly environments, while
minimizing displacement of residents and community-focused businesses.
305.6
The proposed alley closing would help preserve the historic buildings on the site by allowing them to be
expanded in the rear and connected. The new building would contribute to the pedestrian-friendliness
of the area by having ground floor retail and by being close to the Capitol South Metrorail station.
Policy LU-1.4.2 Development Around Metrorail Stations
In developments above and around Metrorail stations emphasize land uses and building forms that
minimize the need for automobile use and maximize transit ridership while reflecting the design capacity
of each station and respecting the character and needs of the surrounding areas.
307.10
The site is approximately 0.3 miles from the Capitol South Metrorail station so its location should
minimize the need for automobile use to the site. Plans for the building include ground floor retail
space, event space, and office space. These uses could maximize transit ridership to the area.
Policy LU-1.4.5: Development Along Corridors
Encourage growth and development along major corridors, particularly priority transit and multimodal
corridors. Plan and design development adjacent to Metrorail stations and corridors to respect the
character, scale, and integrity of adjacent neighborhoods, including appropriate transitions and buffers,
while balancing against the District’s broader need for housing.
307.14
The proposed alley closure would allow for the expansion and reuse of historic buildings on a site that is
in the Pennsylvania Ave. Priority Corridor. The proposed additions would be in the rear and not visible
from the street so they should not have a significant impact on the character and scale of the
neighborhood along Pennsylvania Ave. NW.
Policy LU-2.2.7: Alley Use
Discourage the conversion of alleys into private yards or developable land when the alleys are part of
the historic fabric of the neighborhood and would otherwise continue to perform their intended
functions, such as access to rear garages and service areas for trash collection. ….
311.8
The proposed alley closure would convert a segment of the alley into developable land, but it should not
impact the functioning of the alley system in this square. The alley segment currently connects lots 843
and 842 to the public alley system but when the lots and buildings on the subject site are combined, this
alley segment would no longer be needed. The new building would have direct access to the 20-ft wide
public alley system so the alley segment would no longer be necessary. Closing the segment should not
impact the main alley system or the services operating in it.
Economic Development Element
Policy ED-3.2.6: Commercial Displacement
Avoid displacement of small, minority, and local businesses due to rising real estate costs. Develop
programs to offset the impacts of rising operating expenses on small businesses in areas of rapidly

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 23-01974, Square 762
June 27, 2023 Page 5 of 6
rising rents and prices. Also consider enhanced technical support that helps long-standing businesses
grow their revenues and thrive in the strengthening retail economy. 714.11
Previously, Capitol Lounge was located on this site but it closed in 2020. According to the applicant,
there are currently no businesses operating on the property.
Urban Design Element
The critical urban design issues facing Washington, DC are addressed in this element. These include:
• Affirming civic identity through a focus on the historic intention of the District’s design;
• Strengthening neighborhood quality of life while accommodating growth and change;
• Providing compatible infill development and appropriate transitions between varying uses and
densities;
• Supporting a vibrant urban life that enhances the accessibility, performance, and beauty of
public streets and spaces; and
• Realizing design excellence and innovation in architecture, infrastructure, and public spaces to
elevate the human experience of the built environment.
900.2
The overarching goal for urban design in the District is to enhance the beauty, equity, and livability of
Washington, DC by reinforcing its historic design legacy and the identity of its neighborhoods and
centers, harmoniously integrating new construction with existing buildings and the natural environment,
and improving the vitality, appearance, and function of streets and public spaces.
901.1
The proposed alley closure would allow for the historic buildings on the site to be adaptively reused.
The buildings would be expanded in the rear and connected with the adjacent building on lot 839 to
become one large commercial building. This would make them better able to accommodate growth and
change while maintaining their existing historic appearance on Pennsylvania Avenue. Consequently, the
redevelopment of these building should not impact the historic design legacy and identity of this
neighborhood.
Policy UD-1.1.2: Reinforcing L’Enfant’s 1791 Plan for the City of Washington and Olmsted
Highway Plans
Preserve and reinforce the Plan of the City of Washington, and Olmsted Highway plans to maintain the
District’s unique and historic character, such as the grand avenues and connections to nature. This
policy should be achieved through a variety of urban design measures, including restoration of
previously closed streets, appropriate building placement, view preservation, enhancement of L’Enfant
Plan reservations (green spaces), limits on street and alley closings and the siting of new monuments
and memorials in locations of visual prominence. Restore obstructed view corridors and vistas, where
contributing to a historic resource where possible.
903.10
The proposed closure is in the L’Enfant 1791 plan area but since the request is for an alley and not a
street it is not subject to the Historic Preservation review. Historic Preservation staff is working with the
applicant on the design of the additions to ensure that the additions are compatible with the Capitol Hill
Historic District.
Central Washington Area Element
Policy CW-1.1.21: Downtown Street and Block Pattern
Maintain a fine-grained pattern of downtown blocks, streets, and alleys, with intersections and frontages
that encourage pedestrian movement and reduce the potential for immense variations in scale and

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 23-01974, Square 762
June 27, 2023 Page 6 of 6
fortress like office buildings. Preserve and encourage activation of historic alleys like Blagden, Naylor,
and Prather’s.
1608.22
The subject alley is within the Central Washington planning area but is not considered a historic alley.
Closing this portion of the alley should not impact the pattern of development along this alley system or
the pedestrian improvement in this area.
As such, the proposal would, on balance, not be inconsistent with the Comprehensive Plan, including
when viewed through a racial equity lens. There are no businesses or residents currently on the site so
closing the alley to expand the buildings would not displace any existing businesses. The closure would
increase the amount of commercial space on the site, which provide amenity to the neighborhood
residents and transit-accessible jobs to the area.
VI. Housing Linkage
IM-3.4 Commercial Linkage 2514
The housing linkage objective requires applicants who obtain an increase of nonresidential square
footage -- as a result of providing habitable non-residential penthouse space, of obtaining a discretionary
street or alley closing, or of obtaining a discretionary zoning density increase--to produce housing or
contribute funds to the HPTF. The amount based on a formula tied to the amount or value of the additional
square footage obtained.
2514.1
The application indicates that, although there will be additions to existing buildings facilitated by this
alley closing and the new building would be put to non-residential uses, the proposed project does not
utilize the density from the closed portion of the alley. Should the Dept. of Building concur with this
assessment at the time of permit application, the applicant would not be required to produce housing or
contribute to the Housing Production Trust fund. If the project now or in the future utilizes the density
from the closed alley, it will be subject to the housing linkage requirement.
VII. CONCLUSION
The information provided by the applicant is adequate to meet the requirements of 14 DCMR § 1400.8,
for a project at this stage of its design development, subject to DDOT concurrence.

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department of Public Works
Solid Waste Management Administration
MEMORANDUM
To: Diana Dorsey
Joseph Snider
Acting Chief Building Official
Surveyor, D.C.
From: Reginald L. May
Sign or Initial
Associate Administrator SWMA, DPW
Subject: SUBJECT: Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 2319-S.O. 22-02364
(Revised)
Date: July 28th, 2023
This project will not cause a negative environmental impact if project developers and owners are
following applicable laws and regulations governing solid waste management during all phases of the
project.
District laws require that the property and the abutting public space be maintained free of litter, dust
management, and debris daily, and that all solid waste be properly containerized and removed at
sufficient frequency by a licensed solid waste Collector.
Should you have any questions you can contact me by email at; reginald.may2@dc.gov. I am available
by telephone on (202-645- 3900).

MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider, DC Surveyor
SUBJECT: Proposed Closure of an Alley in Square 762; (S.O. 23-01974)
DATE: April 12, 2023
Thank you for contacting the DC Historic Preservation Office regarding the above-referenced alley
closure. We appreciate the opportunity to review this action. However, § 9-202.02(4) of the D.C.
Code only requires the Mayor to refer applications “to close any street located on the L’Enfant Street
Plan” to the Historic Preservation Review Board. We have no comment on this proposed action
since this closure involves an alley rather than a street.
BY: _______________________________
C. Andrew Lewis
Senior Historic Preservation Specialist
DC State Historic Preservation Office
23-0544
1100 4th Street, S.W., Suite E650, Washington, D.C. 20024 Phone: 202-442-7600 Fax: 202-442-7638

Office of Construction and Building Standards
Office of the Surveyor
May 12, 2025
MEMORANDUM
TO: Brian Kirrane, Fiscal Analyst
Office of Revenue Analyst
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
FROM: Ramón O. Labrador
Deputy Surveyor, D.C.
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement for the Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762
S.O. 23-01974
Please provide the Fiscal Impact Statement for the proposed closing of a public alley in Square
762 Attached is a copy of the S.O. file and legislation for this proposal.
Upon completion of the review, please return the Fiscal Impact Statement to the Surveyor’s Office
attention Diana Dorsey Hill, Program Specialist at diana.dorsey@dc.gov. for transmittal to the
Council of the District of Columbia.
Attachments(s)
DC Department of Buildings | 1100 4th St SW, Washington, DC 20024 |202.671.3500 | dob.dc.gov

asHNGTON Government of the District of Columbia
D C Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department
JohnA. Donnelly,Sr.
Muriel Bowser
Fireand EMSChiat
‘Mayor
MEMORANDUM
To: Christopher Cohen
Holland and Knight
FROM: _ JonathanA. Davis CO/PLT: —FPD
BFC-Assistant Fire Marshal
DATE: May 26, 2023
SUBJECT: S.O 23-01974 Square 762
This written correspondence is being forwardedtoyourofficeto addresstheproposed landdedication,
that was submittedto DCFEMS OfficeoftheFireMarshal forreview.
Basedonourreview,the followingfindingsarebeingbrought forth: DCFEMS OfficeoftheFireMarshal
has noobjectionto this requestbeingapproved. However,theapplicant shall ensurethat all fire
department accessandservice featuresareinaccordancewiththe InternationalFire Code2015 edition,
andDCMR 12-H FireCode Supplement2017 edition.
Ifyouhaveany questionsorconcerns, pleasedonothesitatetocontactmyofficeat (202)-727-1614.
Sincerely,
Johathan A. Davis
BFC-AssistantFire Marshal
DCFEMS-Fire PreventionDivision
Frank D. ReevesMunicipalCenter
phone: (202)673-3320
200014thStreet, NW, Suite500
facsimile: (202)482-0807
wonw fersde.gov
‘Washington, 0C'20009

PUBLIC ALLEY CLOSED
PURSUANT TO D.C. LAW , EFFECTIVE SQUARE 762
THE ALLEY SHOWN THUS: 77777 |S CLOSED AND TITLE VESTS
AS SHOWN UPON RECORDATION OF THIS PLAT.
OFFICE OF THE SURVEYOR, D.C.
, 2023
| CERTIFY THAT THIS PLAT IS CORRECT AND IS RECORDED.
SURVEYOR, D.C.
S
0
2
.
6 9
C
S
B
PUBLIC.
SURVEYOR'S OFFICE, D.C.
Madefor: _CHRIS COHEN
Drawn by: B.D.M. Checked by: a 3)
Record and computations by: __B.
Recorded at:
Recorded in Book Page SR-23-01974
Scale: 1 inch= 20feet
2023/ALLEYCLOSING/SR-23-01974-SQ.762
x
YELLA
CILBUP
8
.E.S
,TEERTS
DR3

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
MEMORANDUM
TO: Mr. Joseph E. Snider.
Surveyor of the District of Columbia
FROM: Anthony G. Lee
Supervisory Construction Analyst
DATE: September 5, 2023
RE: Alley closing proposal for a dead-end portion of the existing alley system
in Square 762 (S.O. #23-01974)
SUBJECT:
Thank you for contacting the DC Department of Housing and Community Development
(DHCD) regarding the requested closure of a dead-end portion of the existing alley system in
Square 762. We thank you for the opportunity to review this proposed action. DHCD has no
objection and takes no exceptions regarding these proposed plat revision and alley closure.
DHCD has reviewed the information provided and has determined that this application
request (the accompanying scope of work and revised plat document) does not impact any of
DHCD's current and existing operations, projects or proposed Project Pipeline.
Department of Housing and Community Development | 1800 Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue, SE, Washington, DC 20020 | 202.442.7200 | dhcd.dc.gov

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Transportation
d. Planning and Sustainability Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph Snider
DC Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor, DOB
FROM: Anna Chamberlin
Associate Director
DATE: June 13, 2023
SUBJECT: S.O. No. 23‐01974 – Alley Closure in Square 762
The District Department of Transportation (DDOT) has reviewed the application materials provided by the Office
of the Surveyor. The purpose of this memorandum is to provide DDOT’s comments on the proposed closure.
OVERVIEW
Clear Plains, LLC and 753, LLC (jointly the “Applicant”) seeks to close a portion of an existing public alley to
facilitate expansion of the adjacent existing historic buildings on four (4) lots into a single building. The alley is
surrounded by Lots 58, 823, 839, 842, and 843 in Square 762. The Applicant is currently pursuing a subdivision to
combine Lots 823, 839, 842, and 843 into a single record lot, and will include the 918 SF of alley to be closed if
this right‐of‐way closure is granted. Lot 839 will be on its own A&T lot owned by 753, LLC and the other lots will
be on a combined A&T lot owned by Clear Plains, LLC, which are both entities of the same owner. The public
alley stub proposed to be closed is 10 feet wide and connects to an existing public alley network to remain. The
proposed closure is shown in Figure 1 below.
DISCUSSION
The single larger building will include office, retail, and event space with a courtyard at the center of the site.
This building will continue to not provide any off‐street parking and trash will continue to be stored on private
property in the designated trash room within the building with collection occurring from the 25‐foot alley
network to remain open. Figure 2 below depicts the proposed development proposal.
District Department of Transportation | 250 M Street SE, Washington, DC 20003 | 202.673.6813 | ddot.dc.gov

S.O. No. 23‐01974 – Alley Closure in Square 762
It is noted that no other adjacent lots in Square 762 have access to or will lose access to the alley stub proposed
to be closed. Lots 820 and 840, facing 3rd Street SE, are blocked from access to the alley stub today by Lot 839
and will be in the future by its proposed building addition. Lots 820 and 840 utilize a narrow private walking alley
from 3rd Street where trash is stored and then rolled to the curb for collection. After reviewing the application
materials and evaluating the potential impacts to the transportation network and adjacent property owners’
access, DDOT has determined that there is no longer a transportation need for the 918 SF alley stub proposed to
be closed.
Figure 1 | Draft Alley Closure Plat
Source: Office of the Surveyor
2

S.O. No. 23‐01974 – Alley Closure in Square 762
Figure 2 | Proposed Development Plan
Source: CORE architecture + design, inc., Dated 1/30/23
DDOT ASSETS
DDOT requires the Applicant to compensate the District for the removal of existing DDOT assets in the proposed
alley closure. Figure 3 below provides a detailed breakdown of existing DDOT assets and associated costs, which
totals $7,538.20.
3

S.O. No. 23‐01974 – Alley Closure in Square 762
Figure 3 | DDOT Assets in Existing Alley
Source: DDOT Streetlight Division
RECOMMENDATION
DDOT supports the closure, but objects to the recordation of the alley closure plat until the Applicant satisfies all
the following conditions:
 The Applicant compensates DDOT in the amount of $7,538.20;
 The Applicant demonstrates they have subdivided and combined Lots 823, 839, 842 and 843 into a
single record lot; and
 The Applicant demonstrates they have filed a building permit application with the Department of
Buildings (DOB) for a proposal for a single building like what was presented in Figure 2 of this report.
AC:kb
4

April 3, 2023
Mr. Joseph Snider, D.C. Surveyor
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, S.W., 3rd Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Subject: Street/Alley Closing Application S.O. 23-01974
Dear Mr. Snider:
The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (DC Water) is in receipt of the application
and plat(s) you forwarded to us for comments on April 3, 2023 regarding S.O. 23-01974. DC Water
currently operates or maintains the following facilities located within the proposed street/alley closing
area:
1. Existing Vitrified Clay Pipe Sewer located in the alley.
These facilities must be maintained to provide water and/or sewer services for the public good.
Therefore, DC Water objects to the proposed street/alley closings requested in S.O. 23-01974 unless the
Applicant executes and records an easement that allows for the continued operation and maintenance of
these facilities. DC Water requires the applicant to execute an easement, as provided in the attachment,
with no restrictions at, on, below or above the grade of the surface of the ground to a minimum height of
twenty-five (25) feet, and be contiguous with the existing right of way.
Page 1 of 2

Please have the applicant contact me to resolve the objection at their convenience. I can be reached
at the contact information listed below.
Regards,
Kevin Harney
Easement and Covenant Coordinator
District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority
1100 4th Street, SW Suite #310
Washington, DC 20024
202-646-8627 Office
202-646-8628 Fax
kevin.harney@dcwater.com
DC Water - Water is Life!
Page 2 of 2

Prepared by and Return to:
DC Water and Sewer Authority
1100 4th Street, SW # 310
Washington, DC 20024
S.O. 16-00000
EASEMENT AGREEMENT
THIS EASEMENT AGREEMENT (“Agreement”) made this 3rd day of January,
2016 between JOHN DOE or ABC, LLC, herein called “Grantor,” and the DISTRICT
OF COLUMBIA WATER AND SEWER AUTHORITY, an independent authority of
the District of Columbia, herein called “Authority”.
RECITALS
WHEREAS, Grantor owns that certain real property located in the District of
Columbia and described and shown in the attached Exhibit A (the “Subject Property”);
and
WHERES, Grantor has requested, in an application made to the District of
Columbia Office of the Surveyor, filed as S.O. 16-00000, dated January 1, 2016 (the
“Grantor’s Application”), that the District of Columbia legally close certain street(s)
and/or alley(s) as described and shown in the attached Exhibit A (the “Surveyor’s
Plat”); and
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and
Department of Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996, as
amended, (D.C. Law 11-111, D.C. Official Code §§ 34-2202.01 et seq.) Authority is
responsible for the planning, designing, constructing, operating, maintaining regulating,
financing, repairing, modernizing, and improving the District Improvements for the water
distribution and sewage collection, treatment and disposal systems and services within
the District of Columbia; and
WHEREAS, Authority, by letter dated January 2, 2016 to the District of
Columbia Office of the Surveyor, has issued its objection to the closing of street(s) and/or
alley(s) closing proposed in S.O. 16-00000 due to the presence of the following facilities:
List of Facilities Here, which is/are located in the area described and shown in the
attached Exhibit A (the “Easement Area”), and whose operation must be maintained for
the public good; and
WHEREAS, as a condition to close said streets and or alleys, Grantor has agreed
to execute an easement in the form as set forth in this Agreement; and
Page 1 of 9

WHEREAS, the Authority and Grantor mutually acknowledge and agree that the
terms of this Agreement are intended to run with and bind the Subject Property from the
point in time that the District of Columbia Office of the Surveyor records the plat filed in
S.O. 16-00000 to close the alley and vest title to the land in Grantor; and
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the benefit to Grantor, and other good
and valuable consideration, the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged by Grantor
and Authority, Grantor, on behalf of itself and successive owners of Subject Property,
and Authority hereby agree as follows:
1. Grant of Easement. Grantor hereby grants unto Authority and its
successors and assigns, an easement (“Easement”) with the right of pedestrian and
vehicular ingress and egress in, on, under, over to a minimum height of twenty-five feet
(25 Ft.) above finished grade, and across the full width and length of alley area as
described and shown in the attached Exhibit A (the “Easement Area”). Grantor grants
unto Authority the right to install, construct, reconstruct, alter, maintain, repair, enlarge,
relocate and inspect all Facilities, including but not limited to, pipes, manholes, and other
appurtenances the Authority deems appropriate, now or in the future, to and/or for water
service and sanitary, combined, and storm sewer service together with their related
facilities for the water distribution and sewage collection, treatment, and disposal systems
(individually and collectively, the “Facilities”).
2. Facilities Ownership and Maintenance. Title to all Facilities in the
Easement Area shall remain vested in the District of Columbia and under the operational
jurisdiction and control of Authority. Authority shall make any repairs or replacements
to the Facilities it deems necessary for their proper upkeep and maintenance. Following
any work by Authority that disturbs the surface of the Easement Area, Authority shall
restore the surface, including ordinary lawns, standard walks, roadways, driveways and
parking lot surfacing, to the condition in which it existed prior to Authority’s work;
provided, however, Authority will in no case be responsible for replacing or paying for
the repair or replacement of any structure, tree or other surface feature violative of this
Agreement, specifically including paragraph 4 below.
3. Access to Subject Property. During the course of any work permitted
hereunder and during any periodic inspection and maintenance of the Facilities or the
Easement Area, Authority shall be permitted to access the Easement Area with persons,
vehicles and any other equipment it deems necessary. In addition to the foregoing,
Authority, and its respective agents and employees, shall have the right to use land of the
Grantor adjoining the Easement Area to the extent reasonably necessary to facilitate
replacement, alteration, maintenance, inspection, operation and any necessary repairs;
provided, however, that this right to use adjoining land shall be exercised only during
periods of actual replacement, alteration, maintenance, inspection, operation or repair,
and then only to the minimum extent necessary for such work; and further, this right to
use adjoining land shall not be construed to allow the Authority to erect any building,
structure or facilities of a permanent nature on Subject Property.
Page 2 of 9

4. Interference with Use. Grantor shall use and operate the Easement Area
so that there is no unreasonable interference with Authority’s use and operation of the
Facilities and the Easement Area. Grantor shall not erect any buildings, walls or other
structures in the Easement Area either above or below grade that impair the Authority’s
ability to excavate and repair the Facilities, and shall not plant or allow any trees being
planted or grown thereon. In addition, Grantor is specifically prohibited from
constructing or placing in the Easement Area any structure, container, surface or
subsurface feature (including, without limitation, swimming pools, ponds and detention
basins) for the storage or containment of any liquids including, without limitation, water,
heating oil, gasoline, diesel fuel, and liquefied natural gas. However, non-structural
fences, walks, pavement for driveways and parking lot surfacing may be constructed or
placed within the Easement Area. Authority shall have the right at all times to cut or
remove any trees or structures or other obstructions in the Easement Area at Grantor’s
expense. Further, Grantor shall not cause or permit a change of grade of the Easement
Area resulting in an increase or decrease in the grade by more than twelve inches (12”).
Grantor may allow other utility providers to install conduit, cable or pipes in the
Easement Area provided such installed materials cross the Facilities at an angle of not
less than forty-five (45) degrees. Grantor reserves the right to continue to use the land
within the Easement Area for any use and purposes which shall not violate in any way the
preceding restrictions and which shall not interfere with the use thereof by Authority in
fulfilling the purposes for which this Easement is granted.
5. Interference with Facilities. Grantor agrees and covenants to and with
Authority that any building or other structure (whether one or more, “Structure”)
constructed and erected, or caused to be constructed and erected, by Grantor on the
Subject Property shall, in addition to complying with all requirements of applicable laws
and regulations, be so constructed that no structural load shall rest upon, or be transmitted
either directly or indirectly to, the Facilities and that no part of any Structure, or of the
foundations thereof, shall be installed within 5 feet, vertically or horizontally, of said
Facilities.
6. Damage from Construction of Structure. Grantor covenants that it shall
and will conduct, or cause to be conducted, the work of construction or erection of any
Structure in such manner that no harm or damage will be done or result to the Facilities,
and Grantor does further covenant to pay to Authority, promptly and without demand by
Authority, the total and entire cost to Authority of any repairs, or other work directly
related to such repairs, of the Facilities resulting from the construction or existence of the
Structure.
7. Relocation and Termination.
(a) Authority may permit Grantor to replace, relocate, modify or remove all,
or portions of, the Facilities (such replacement, relocation, modification or removal of
Facilities being referred to herein as the "Facilities Changes") subject to the following
conditions:
Page 3 of 9

(1) Grantor shall have submitted a District of Columbia Department of
Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Permit Application and plans for the Facility Changes,
including a schedule for installation, that comply with the District of Columbia
Construction Codes Supplement, as amended, and Authority’s design and specification
requirements;
(2) Authority shall have approved the plans for the Facilities Changes
(the “Approved Plans”), provided that Authority’s approval may not be unreasonably
withheld;
(3) The construction and installation of the Facilities Changes shall be
at Grantor's sole cost and expense; and
(4) The Facilities Changes will not adversely affect the sewer and
water services for the property(ies) served by the Facilities.
(b) As and when the Facilities Changes are completed in accordance with the
Approved Plans, have been inspected, and accepted by Authority, and are operational,
Authority agrees to execute a document, in recordable form, releasing this Agreement for
any portion of the Facilities that will be removed from service and for which Authority
shall have no obligation to operate or maintain. Authority shall have no responsibility
for the costs of recordation. This Agreement, however, shall remain in effect with regard
to all other Facilities; provided, however, this Agreement including exhibits shall be
modified to reflect the revised location of the Easement Area and of the Facilities.
8. Miscellaneous.
(a) Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts
each of which shall constitute an original and all of which together shall constitute one
and the same instrument.
(b) Governing Law; Jurisdiction. This Agreement shall be governed by the
laws of the District of Columbia without reference to choice of laws principles thereof.
The parties hereto accept the jurisdiction of the Superior Court of the District of
Columbia as the court of competent jurisdiction to resolve matters under this Agreement.
(c) Binding Effect. The parties agree that the terms and conditions of this
Agreement shall (i) be binding upon, and shall inure to the benefit of, their respective
heirs, legal representatives, successors and assigns, and (ii) run with the land and be
binding upon and inure to the benefit of all parties owning or having any interest in the
Subject Property.
Page 4 of 9

(d) Written Modifications. No change or modification of this Agreement
shall be valid unless the same is in writing, signed by the parties hereto and recorded in
the land records. No purported or alleged waiver of any of the provisions of this
Agreement shall be valid or effective unless in writing signed by the party against whom
it is sought to be enforced.
(e) Further Actions. The parties hereto shall at any time and from time to
time after the execution of this Agreement, upon request of any party, do, execute,
acknowledge and deliver, or will cause to be done, executed, acknowledged or delivered,
all such further acts, deeds, conveyances and assurances as reasonably may be required to
effectuate the purposes of this Agreement.
(f) Severability of Provisions. In the event that one or more of the provisions
of this Agreement shall be held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, each such
provision shall be deemed severable and the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall
continue in full force and effect.
(g) Covenants. By executing this Agreement, each of the parties represents
that: (i) it is authorized to enter into, execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform
its obligations hereunder; (ii) this Agreement is effective and enforceable against such
party in accordance with its terms; (iii) the person signing on such party's behalf is duly
authorized to execute this Agreement; and (iv) no other signatures or approvals are
necessary in order to make all of the representations of such party contained in this
paragraph true and correct.
(h) Incorporation of Recitals and Exhibits. The Recitals and Exhibits are
hereby incorporated herein and made a part of this Agreement by reference.
(i) Indemnification. In connection with the construction by Grantor of any
structure or building abutting or encroaching upon the Easement Area, Grantor will
assume all liability for any damage to the Facilities. Grantor shall indemnify, hold
harmless, protect and defend Authority and its officers, directors, employees and agents
against and from all losses, damages, liabilities, suits, claims, demands, expenses
(including, without limitation, attorneys’ fees), judgments, interest and costs incurred or
suffered by Authority or its officers, directors, employees and agents that arise either as a
result of Grantor’s negligence or as a result of Authority’s use of or entry in the Easement
Area including the installation, operation, maintenance and replacement of all or any
portion of the Facilities. GRANTOR SPECIFICALLY INDEMNIFIES AUTHORITY
FOR AUTHORITY’S OWN SIMPLE NEGLIGENCE.
Page 5 of 9

(j) Remedies. If either party shall fail to comply with the terms and
conditions contained herein, the non-defaulting party may seek specific performance of
such term and conditions and any direct damages resulting from breach thereof, in
addition to any other rights or remedies available to the non-defaulting party at law or in
equity, but in no event may either Grantor or Authority seek punitive or consequential
damages that may arise as a result of a failure to comply with the terms and conditions of
this Agreement.
(k) Anti-Deficiency Acts. The obligations of Authority to fulfill financial
obligations, if any, pursuant to this Agreement, or any subsequent agreement entered into
pursuant to this Agreement or referenced herein (to which Authority is a party), are and
shall remain subject to the provisions of (i) the federal Anti-Deficiency Act, 31 U.S.C.
§§ 1341, 1342, 1349-1351 1511-1519; (ii) the D.C. Official Code §§ 1-206.03(e) and 47-
105; (iii) the District of Columbia Anti-Deficiency Act, D.C. Official Code §§ 47-355.01
– 355.08; and (iv) the Section 446 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, D.C.
Official Code § 1-204.46 (collectively, (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv), as amended from time to
time, the “Anti-Deficiency Acts”). Pursuant to the Anti-Deficiency Acts, nothing in this
Agreement shall create an obligation of Authority in anticipation of an appropriation by
Congress for such purpose, and Authority’s legal liability for the payment of any charges
under this Agreement shall not arise or obtain in advance of the lawful availability of
appropriated funds for the applicable fiscal year as approved by Congress.
[SIGNATURE PAGES FOLLOW]
Page 6 of 9

IN WITNESS WHEREOF Authority, acting through its General Manager and
CEO, has caused this instrument to be executed as of the day and year written first above.
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA WATER AND SEWER AUTHORITY
By: ______________________
Name: George S. Hawkins
Title: General Manager and CEO
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA:
I, ________________________________, a Notary Public in and for the aforesaid
jurisdiction do hereby certify that George S. Hawkins, as General Manager and CEO
representing the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority, party to the foregoing
Easement Agreement bearing the date of the 3rd day of January, 2016, personally
appeared before me in said jurisdiction, the said George S. Hawkins being personally
well known to me as the person who executed said Easement Agreement and
acknowledged the same to be the act and deed of the District of Columbia Water and
Sewer Authority.
Given under my hand and seal this ________ day of ____________, 2016.
_______________________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC
My Commission Expires ___________________
Page 7 of 9

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Grantor, has caused this instrument to be executed as
of the day and year written first above.
JOHN DOE
By:
Name: John Doe
Title: Owner
STATE OF: ___________________________ )
) ss:
COUNTY OF: ___________________________ )
I, ________________________________, a Notary Public in and for the aforesaid
jurisdiction do hereby certify that John Doe, as Owner representing John Doe, party to
the foregoing Easement Agreement bearing the date of the 3rd day of January, 2016,
personally appeared before me in said jurisdiction, the said John Doe being personally
well known to me as the person who executed said Easement Agreement and
acknowledged the same to be his or her act and deed and the act and deed of John Doe.
Given under my hand and seal this ________ day of ____________, 2016.
_______________________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC
My Commission Expires ___________________
Page 8 of 9

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Grantor, acting through its President, has caused this
instrument to be executed as of the day and year written first above.
ABC, LLC
By:
Name: ABC, LLC
Title: President
STATE OF: ___________________________ )
) ss:
COUNTY OF: ___________________________ )
I, ________________________________, a Notary Public in and for the aforesaid
jurisdiction do hereby certify that Jane Smith, as President representing ABC, LLC, party
to the foregoing Easement Agreement bearing the date of the 3rd day of January, 2016,
personally appeared before me in said jurisdiction, the said Jane Smith being personally
well known to me as the person who executed said Easement Agreement and
acknowledged the same to be his or her act and deed and the act and deed of ABC, LLC.
Given under my hand and seal this ________ day of ____________, 2016.
_______________________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC
My Commission Expires ___________________
Page 9 of 9

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Office of Tax and Revenue
MEMORANDUM
To: Kathleen A Beeton
Zoning Administrator
From: Eugene Clindinin, Supervisory Appraiser
OTR/RPTA/RPAD
Date: November 21, 2025
Subject: Most probable assessed value for S.O. 23-01974 Public Alley Closed in Square 762.
Reference: S.O. 23-01974 Public Alley Closed in Square 762.
Pursuant to the request received November 13, 2025, we have derived the most probable estimate
of value for the above-referenced tract of land.
The most probable estimate of value as of January 1, 2025, which represents tax year 2026, for the
Public Alley Closed in Square 762 is $265,120. The rounded estimate is explained as follows.
 $265,120 (918 S.F. X $288.80 estimated square foot) for the Public Alley Closed.
The rounded probable estimate addresses lot amenities and is based on the lot 0060 of Square
2068. Lot 0060 formally lots 0823, 0839, 0842, & 0843.
If you have any questions, please contact me at eugene.clindinin@dc.gov
1101 4th Street, S.W.▪ Suite W550▪ Washington, D.C. 20024 ▪ 202.442.6760 ▪MyTax.dc.gov

Office of Construction and Building Standards
Office of the Surveyor
APPLICATION TO CLOSE/DEDICATE A STREET OR ALLEY OR
ELIMINATION OF A BUILDING RESTRICTION LINE
4
Street: Alley:
Name: C losing NE portion of existing alley system in Square 762
Abutting Squares: 7 62
Portion to be closed/dedicated: Abutting Lots 842, 843, and 823
Per Sketch Attached, This Application is Made By:
Applicant's Name: Cle ar Plains LLC
Phone Number: 771-200-7220
christopher.cohen@hklaw.com
Email Address:
I certify that the above information is true to the best of my
knowledge.
Signature of Applicant or Agent:
TO REPORT WASTE, FRAUD OR ABUSE BY ANY DC GOVERNMENT OFFICE OR
OFFICIAL, CALL THE INSPECTOR GENERAL AT 1-800-521-1639

Office of Construction and Building Standards
Office of the Surveyor
Retail Tenant Displacement Form
Note: The following information is required relative to provisions of DC Law
6-133 (DC Act 6-171).
An application for the proposed closing/dedication of the following street(s)
or alley(s), the undersigned, being the applicant or the agent for the
applicant, hereby makes the following representations as complete and
true:
All properties associated with the proposed closing/dedication are
listed as follows:
762
Square No.:
842, 843, 823
Lot Number:
The proposed closing/dedication will □or will not □result in displacement of
existing retail tenants because of the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or
discontinuance of an existing building.
N/A
Name of Displaced:
N/A
Address:
N/A
Square/Lot:
1/30/2023
Date:
Christopher S. Cohen
Signer’s Name:
Signature of Applicant:
Note: This form must be completed, signed, and submitted with the
application.

PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
0843 0842 0839
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
Awning over
Concrete Patio
Fence 1 Story
Addition
1
0
'
0823
1 Story
CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 | 229, 231, 233, 203 Rear | Existing Conditions 10.21.22
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Existing Conditions SquaZre 0.7S62 D.1
washCingOtoRn, Edc a20r0c0h7itecture + design, inc. CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202. 1 46 0 6 1 .6 0 1 w 16 is c o c n or s e i d n c. a c v om e n w @ , c s o u re it d e c 405 ©CORE architecture + design, inc.
Rydin Block ProjectNumber 21046.33
washington,dc 20007
Printed9/20/22
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute
©2022COREarchitecture+design,inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
229 PA AVE SE 231 PA AVE SE 233 PA AVE SE
1 Story
203 Rear 3rd St ST SE

Capitol - 1 Block Independence Ave SE
229/231 Pennsylvania Ave SE
Square 0762 Lot 0842/0843
Approximate Lot Size - 3,134 SF
Zoned Mixed-Use (MU-26)
233 Pennsylvania Ave SE
Square 0762 Lot 0839
MU-24
84'-11"
Pennsylvania
Ave
SE
A
Zo
p
n
p
e
ro
d
x
M
im
ix
a
e
te
d -
L
U
o
s
t
e
S
(
i
M
ze
U
-
- 2
2
6
,5
)
00 SF
203 Rear 3rd St SE
Square 0762 Lot 0823
Approximate Lot Size - 2,371 SF
Zoned Mixed-Use (MU-26)
814 sq ft
C st SE C st SE
1” = 50’-0” SCALE AND NORTH ARROW
CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 1
ES
tS
dn2
ES
tS
dn2
ES
tS
dr3
ES
tS
dr3
ES
tS
ht4
ES
tS
ht4
Capitol Lounge Office
PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Restrooms
UP
Beer Cooler
UP UP
DN
-9'-0" (74.5')
Kitchen Prep
Capitol Lounge
Flex Space
Kitchen Storage
CPI Storage/Office
DN
UP Proposed
Subdivision
Existing Alley
UP
-6'-9 1/2" (76.71')
UP
Basement/Cellar .02
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block Project Number 21046.33
Printed 10/20/22
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Three Story Addition at Rear of 229
Pennsylvania Ave SE
Code Modification being Sought to Allow
Additional Egress from 203 to Addition
Three Story Addition at Rear of 231
Pennsylvania Ave SE, Replaces
current One Story Addition.
E|W SECTION
N.I.C
Three Story Addition at Rear of 233 N
Pennsylvania Ave SE
New Addition
N|S SECTION N.I.C
SCALE: 1/16" = 1'-0"

PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
New Bay Projection
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar + Rooftop
ADDITION:
Second Story on
top of Existing
First Level
0" (85.29')
CORE architecture + design, inc. 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 2
Z.SD.2
Proposed Subdivision - Alley Closed
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
Project Number 21046.33
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block
Printed 1/27/23
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Legend
N Properties Included in Application
Adjacent Properties
Square 0762

52'-0"
CORE architecture + design, inc. 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 3
Z.SD.1
Existing Conditions
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
Project Number 21046.33
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block
Printed 1/27/23
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
"4/1
4-'51
PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
0843 0842 0839
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
Awning over
Concrete Patio
Fence 1 Story
ROOF ELEV: ELEV: 84.42' Addition
117.5'
s E h x o is w ti n n g in A B ll l e u y e R 11 O 7 O .5 F ' ELEV:
10'
ELEV: 85.11'
ROOF ELEV:
120.04'
0823
1 Story
0" (85.29')
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Property Existing Lot Area Allowable FAR Existing GFA/FAR Proposed GFA
Included with Application
LOT 0843 -
229 Pennsylvania Ave SE 1,477 SF 3,692.5 SF 3,368 SF 4,464 SF
LOT 0842 -
231 Pennsylvania Ave SE 1,692 SF 4,230 SF 4,209 SF 4,440 SF
LOT 0823 -
203 3rd Street SE Rear 2,358 SF 5,895 SF 1,564 SF 3,128 SF
Adjacent Property
LOT 0839 -
233 Pennsylvania Ave SE 2,326 SF 5,815 SF 6,545 SF 7,600 SF
Total for Subdivision 7,853 SF 19,632.5 SF 15,686 SF 19,632 SF
1 Story
Alley approx.1,000 SF approx. 2,500 SF 0 SF 0 SF
Total with Alley 8,853 SF 22,132.5 SF 15,686 SF 19,632 SF
N
Square 0762

CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 | 203 Rear 3rd St and Alley Conditions 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 4

.14
COCROE RarEch aitercchtuirtee c+t uderesi g+n ,d inecs.ign, inc. Square 0C7ou6r2ty a|r dB Buiridldseinyeg P Aerdspdeicttiiovens 01.30.2023
10110 0w1is0co wnsisinc aovne sniwn, asuviete n4w05, suite 405 Square 0762
Project Number 21046.33
waswhiangsthonin, gdcto 2n0,0 d0c7 20007 Rydin Block CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
Printed 9/15/22
2022.40626..6416166 . 6 1co1r6ed c . c ocmo r e d@cc.ocroemdc @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute ©CORE arc©h2it0e2c2t uCrOeR +E adrechsiitgecnt,u rien c+. d esig5n, inc.

.10
COCROE RarEch aitercchtuirtee c+t uderesi g+n ,d inecs.ign, inc. Square 0762 | 229, 231, 233P ePnensnlnyvsaynliav aAvnei aS EAve SE Exterior Improvements 01.30.2023
10110 0w1is0co wnsisinc aovne sniwn, asuviete n4w05, suite 405 Square 0762
waswhiangsthonin, gdcto 2n0,0 d0c7 20007 at SRtyrdien Belotck Face CONSERVATIVE P P A ro R je T c N t N E u R m S be H r IP 21046.33
Printed 9/15/22
2022.40626..6416166 . 6 1co1r6ed c . c ocmo r e d@cc.ocroemdc @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute ©CORE arc©h2it0e2c2t uCrOeR +E adrechsiitgecnt,u rien c+. d esig6n, inc.

7 RemittanceSourceDocument
DGB
ama
DepartmentofBuildings
ee 1
O
1
f
0
fi
0
c
a
e
th
ofS
S
u
t
r
ro
v
o
e
t
y
S
o
W
r
FFICE 0 , ¥
Wa T s el h , in ( gt 2 on 404 D 2 C -2 2 4 0 5) 0 6 2 6 4 I e : “ J 1 FW / O 3 : 1/202u3
se buc“ant
Date: January 30, 2023 SURVEYOR INVOICE <: ‘ ss
Invoice Number: 4254703
Customer: Chris Cohen Book: Page:
Primary 07620842
Mailing Address:
Associated Lots
Email: Christophor.cohon@hklaw.Com Telephone No.:_7742007220
Nn ofWork: Closing ofthenortheastportionofanexistingalleysystem inSquare762, Lots842,843and823,
Lot
Request: SR23-S0-01974
TypeofPermit: CustomerRequest
Acct Code: Fees: Description:
‘cu0-1010001-200161.20225-6211037-2025
$250.00 EnhancedService Fee-SurveyorRequest
‘©uo-10r0001-s00%81-30225.6211037-2023 $2,600.00 StreetandAlleyClosing InitialApplication(EnterQtytoCalculate)|
InvoiceTotal: ‘$2,750.00
(CreatedBy. DianaHil
Pleasereturnonecopyofthis paid receiptto theSurveyor'sOffice.
Requestsforserviceswill notbeprocesseduntil paid receipt is returned.
Thankyouforyour cooperation.

Office of Finance
and Treasury
Date: 1/91/2023 12:27 PM
Office: DLCP-DOB Term:WFWO1-4LWB1S2
Batch: 78955 Batch Date: 1/31/2023
Cashier :TEMP25
Trans #:13
CUD ~ DEPARTHENT OF BUIL cot: czstaato
Conment/Docunent: SR23-S0-01974
Payment Total: $2,750.00
PaymentDistribution:
302) CUO (3220) 10001-82050 $250.00
302J CUO (3220) 10001-82050 $2,500.00
Ck Tendered: $2,750.00
Thank you for your payment.
Have @ nice day!

Opposition to Square 762 project (S.O. 23-01974)
Dave Kasten <dave.kasten@gmail.com>
Sun 7/16/2023 11:10 PM
To:Dorsey, Diana (DOB) <diana.dorsey@dc.gov>
CAUTION: This email originated from outside of the DC Government. Do not click on links or open a achments unless you
recognize the sender and know that the content is safe. If you believe that this email is suspicious, please forward to
phishing@dc.gov for addi onal analysis by OCTO Security Opera ons Center (SOC).
You don't often get email from dave.kasten@gmail.com. Learn why this is important
Greetings!
I trust this letter finds you in good health and high spirits. I am writing to express my profound
concerns about the proposed closing of a public alley in Square 762, a plan set forth by Clear
Plains LLC.
The alley in question is not merely a path between buildings; it is a piece of our shared history, a
testament to the rich, vibrant tapestry that makes up our community. Its proposed closure
threatens to irrevocably alter the historical landscape of our neighborhood. Such a decision
must not be taken lightly.
While the proposal has been crafted with a seemingly benign intent - to renovate and expand
existing historic buildings - it's imperative to note that this could very well result in an erasure of
the historical context within which these buildings exist. The unique character of our district,
shaped by its history and people, is not confined to individual buildings, but extends to the
spaces between them: our streets and alleys. This public alley, therefore, is an integral part of
our collective history and cultural heritage.
Certainly, the revitalization of historic structures is a commendable objective. However, this
must not come at the expense of a public alley that has served our community for generations. I
firmly believe that it is possible to strike a balance between modernization and preservation;
one that enriches our community without compromising its historical integrity.
I urge you to reconsider the proposed closure of the public alley in Square 762. Let's strive to
harmonize the past and the future, ensuring that our actions today will not only facilitate
growth but also honor and preserve our shared history.
Thank you for your time and for your unwavering dedication to our community. I look forward
to a thoughtful dialogue on this matter.
Best regards,
David Kasten

800 17th Street, NW, Suite 1100 | Washington, DC 20006 | T 202.955.3000 | F 202.955.5564
Holland & Knight LLP | www.hklaw.com
Christine M. Shiker
(202) 457-7167
christine.shiker@hklaw.com
Christopher S. Cohen
(202) 469-5127
christopher.cohen@hklaw.com
January 30, 2023
VIA DCRA ONLINE SUBMISSION AND E-MAIL
Department of Buildings
Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia
c/o Mr. Joseph E. Snider
1100 4th Street, S.W.
Room E320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Joseph.Snider2@dc.gov
Re: Application for Alley Closing
Northeast Portion of Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
On behalf of Clear Plains LLC (the “Applicant”), the owner of property known as Lots
823, 842, and 843 in Square 762 (collectively, the “Site”), we hereby submit this application
requesting the closure of a dead-end portion of the existing alley system in Square 762 (the
“Application”). Accordingly, please find a completed alley closing application form and retail
displacement form for the Application attached hereto as Tab A. A letter authorizing Holland &
Knight to file and process the Application on behalf of the Applicant is attached hereto as Tab B.
We are transmitting contemporaneously the required filing fee of $2,750.00. The Application is
submitted in accordance with 24 DCMR §§ 1400.4 and 1400.8.
The Applicant is seeking to close a dead-end portion of the existing public alley system in
Square 762 in order to facilitate the renovation and expansion of the historic buildings on the Site.
The portion of the alley system to be closed varies in width, generally between approximately 10
and 12 feet, and is not currently used or relied upon for any transportation purpose. Thus, it is
unnecessary for alley purposes and can be closed pursuant to DC Code § 9-202.01. The proposed
closing is depicted on the sketch attached hereto as Tab C.
As shown on the initial development plans attached hereto as Tab D, the alley closing will
enable the adaptive reuse of the historic buildings on the Site. The Site will be combined into a
single lot of record along with the adjacent property located at 233 Pennsylvania Avenue, SE (Lot
839, Square 762), and the existing historic structures will be connected so as to create a single

building for use by the new ownership. The ground floor will include retail and an entry to the
office space above. The second floor will include office and event space. The third floor will
include event space. The rear of the structure will also house private event space, which will open
into an open courtyard in the center of the newly-combined Site.
The closed public alley will revert to the Applicant as owners of the Site. As shown on the
historical plats attached as Tab E, the Site originally comprised the western part of record Lot 13,
which was divided into four lots as shown on the 1873 plat. In 1887, a portion of the public alley
to be closed was dedicated from the western portion of Lot 13, which resulted in the creation of
Lots 43 through 49 in the square. At some point between 1887 and 1911, the owner of Lot 46
dedicated an additional portion of the alley (± 122.8 square feet), and in 1911, the owner of Lot 45
dedicated the remaining portion of the public alley (± 105 square feet).
The closure of this portion of the public alley system will not disrupt the transportation
system or interfere with access to or from any other properties within the square. Specifically, all
properties that currently have access to a public alley system will continue to have access to the
public alley system. The small portion of the dead-end alley will be combined with the Site, which
also has access from the 20-foot public alley system.
Finally, as required by 24 DCMR § 1400.4(d), a listing of all properties (land and
buildings) associated with the requested alley closing are attached hereto as Tab F.
We would appreciate your processing of the Application at your earliest convenience. If
you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact either of us. Thank you for your attention
to this matter.
Respectfully submitted,
Holland & Knight LLP
_____________________
Christine M. Shiker
Christopher S. Cohen
Attachments
cc: Diana Dorsey Hill
Office of the Surveyor, Program Specialist (via email; w/ attachments)
2
#183341663_v2

800 17th Street, NW, Suite 1100 | Washington, DC 20006 | T 202.955.3000 | F 202.955.5564
Holland & Knight LLP | www.hklaw.com
Christopher S. Cohen
202.469.5127
christopher.cohen@hklaw.com
November 25, 2024
VIA EMAIL
Kenneth D. Young
Outside Plant Engineering – WSAM
Verizon
13101 Columbia Pike, FDC 1
Floor 1
Silver Spring, MD 20904
kenneth.d.young@verizon.com
Re: S.O. 23-01974
Alley Closing in Square 762
Applicant’s Response to Verizon Objection Letter
Dear Mr. Young:
This letter serves to notify you that the applicant for the above-referenced alley closing
application is in receipt of your letter dated April 10, 2023, a copy of which is attached hereto as
Exhibit A. The letter states that Verizon objects to the applicant’s proposal to close a portion of
the existing alley system in Square 762 unless one of the following actions are taken:
(1) An easement will be provided, and paid for by the owners with metes and bounds
description with a plat and all documentation necessary to record the easement to
permit existing telephone plant to remain in its present location subject to Verizon
approval; or
(2) Verizon is fully reimbursed for relocating its plant and feeders. Alley/Street closing
will not take place until these facilities are completely relocated and permanent
services restored fully to all customers affected by the move.
The impacted Verizon facilities are shown on the plan attached hereto as Exhibit B.
Some of the facilities can be removed because they will no longer be needed to serve the
buildings located at 229 Pennsylvania Avenue SE, 231 Pennsylvania Avenue SE, or 203 Rear
Pennsylvania Avenue SE after said properties are redeveloped.
As to the impacted facilities that are still needed to deliver Verizon’s services to
properties within the square, the applicant proposes to fully reimburse Verizon for their
complete relocation.

If this agreement is satisfactory, I would appreciate your removing the objection filed
with the Office of the Surveyor for this alley closing application.
Should you wish to discuss this matter, our team is eager to schedule a meeting at your
earliest convenience so that the applicant can resolve Verizon’s objection as expeditiously as
possible.
Thank you for your considerate attention to this matter. Should you have any questions,
please do not hesitate to contact me at christopher.cohen@hklaw.com or (301) 775-5559.
Sincerely,
Christopher S. Cohen
Attachments
cc: Joe Snider, DC Surveyor (via e-mail; w/ attachments)
Diana Dorsey, DCOS Program Specialist (via e-mail; w/ attachments)
Nathaniel Treen
Project Manager, KCW Engineering Technologies Inc. (via e-email; w/ attachments)
2
#513413417_v1

EXHIBIT A

Network Engineering
OPPE MD/DC
13101 Columbia Pike, FDC 1
Floor 1
Silver Spring, MD 20904
April 10th, 2023
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street SW
Washington, D.C. 20024
RE: Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 762 – S.O. 23-01974
Dear Mr. Snider:
Location: Square 762
Verizon Washington D.C. Inc. objects to the proposal unless one of the two following are
done:
[ ] Service is no longer required in the Square.
[X ] An easement will be provided, and paid for by the owners with metes and bounds description with a plat and all
documentation necessary to record the easement to permit existing telephone plant to remain in its present location subject
to Verizon approval.
[ X ] Verizon is fully reimbursed for relocating its plant and feeders. Alley/Street closing will not take place until
these facilities are completely relocated and permanent services restored fully to all customers affected by the move.
[ ] Telephone cables and terminals are cut off and abandoned.
Very truly yours,
Kenneth D. Young
Engineer, Outside Plant Engineering, WSAM
KDY
c.c. D.C.D.O.T. Underground Location Section
Area Engineer
File

EXHIBIT B

PENNSY(1L60V' WAIDNE -I PAUB LAICV)ENUE, S.E. SITE
.E.S ,)CTILEBUEP -R EDTIWS '0 9D(R3
202.03.52 7M RSETC
1531.6584 .R2E7 CMST 143.11403 R.6E2C MST LOT 383 ,S0Q08U ASRQE.F 7T6. 2REC 161.869.853 M RSETC 87.788 8R.0E8C MSTLOT 8413, 4S7Q7U SAQR 8 . 7 EF . T 7 7 8 .6 8 R R 2 8E E .0C 3 C 8 33 M 7 S 78. T 7..93871 C L O MRO T ES 8 M 4 C 1 T 2, 6 P S9Q 34.24 2 COMP U S 1 A 6 Q 34.4 R 1 . MST 81 .EF 36 . T R8 7 34.12 RE . 9 C E 6 5 R C 2 M E S C T 66.28 COMP 66.43 MST 40 66.16 R . EC 584 R L 0.E O 7C 42 T 0 M . 8 7S 1 2 3 T 29 6 C 1 , O 3S .6 2 M 3 Q6 P . U 5 2 SA 5 Q 9 R . EF MR T 7. S 6 E R2 T E C C 52.85 C 1 OM 0 P .0 5 1 2. R 93 0 MS E T .0C R 4 5 2. M 67 RE E C ST C2&5M.7S1T 32.333 2R.3E3C MST 2222.. 2 9876 5 ' MR P ESCT UBLIC ALLEY 22 24 .. . 97 822 36 8R.8E 2C MR MS ES T CT LO2T,3 85283 S SQ 5511 Q. .. F 41 U 36 TA . MR RR ES E C E T C762 LO8T 1 1 8 , 4 0 4 S 3 S0 Q6L Q S U OS .QF ATQ TU R .8 . F A E 1 R T R 47 E . E 6R C 2 7 E 6 C 2 LO2,T1 2246 SSQQ.UFTA.R REE 7C62
14' PUBLIC ALLEY
TCSEMR 1 00..8811 6600..9898 MRESCT TCSEMR 1 00..8811 2255..7740 MRESCT 3322..4482 MRESCT 5577..6588 MRESCT TCSEMR 2 00..4422TCSEMR 1 00..8811 10' PUBLIC ALLEY 10' PUBLIC ALLEY 3355..1161 MRESCT 5577..6588 MRESCT YELLA CILBUP
'02
90° 90°
S 62°27'00" E 90° 62°22' 117°38' REC&MST22.03 90° 89°57'90°03'90°90°90° 90° 149°50' 175° 151° 62°22' 87°28' 117°38' 92°32' 83°38' 90° 26720°°22' 177°28'9920°°32' 96°22' 90°90° 9900°° 90° 90° 90° 90° 90° HTRON EWCXOIT.M HUM TOUILHNI TI&CY UA PTGOI OLEN X-X-XX--XX-X-XX--XX-XX--X -X- X X - - X X - - -X X X -X -- - XX X-X --X - X X - -X -X - X X - - X X - - -X X X -X - - - X X X -X - - - X X X T - - X - X O - X X - - X X - B - - X X X E -X - - - X X X R -X - - E - X X X- - M X - X - X X - O - X X - - V X - X X -X E - - - X X X D -X - - - X X X - - X - X - X -X - # X - 2 X - 3 - X X 1 T - - X X O - - X X B -X - E X - X R - - X X E - - M X X - O - X X - V X - E X -X D - - X X- - X X - - X T X - O X -X - B - E X #2 - R X 2 E 9 -X M - O X V -X E - D X-X#233 TR TR OE OE L L B B O O E E C C A A T T E E D D #203 #205 90° TROE LBOEC ATED
5P(T1la)0 n2 n08i2nth-g6 ,S3 E8tnr-e4g0ein4te,0 eS r iEn wg, w,W Swua.WrsvhMeiyn-iDnggCto .&cn oL,m aDnCds 2ca0p0e0 A3rchitecture

800 17th Street, NW, Suite 1100 | Washington, DC 20006 | T 202.955.3000 | F 202.955.5564
Holland & Knight LLP | www.hklaw.com
Christine M. Shiker
(202) 457-7167
christine.shiker@hklaw.com
Christopher S. Cohen
(202) 469-5127
christopher.cohen@hklaw.com
January 30, 2023
VIA DCRA ONLINE SUBMISSION AND E-MAIL
Department of Buildings
Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia
c/o Mr. Joseph E. Snider
1100 4th Street, S.W.
Room E320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Joseph.Snider2@dc.gov
Re: Application for Alley Closing
Northeast Portion of Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
On behalf of Clear Plains LLC (the “Applicant”), the owner of property known as Lots
823, 842, and 843 in Square 762 (collectively, the “Site”), we hereby submit this application
requesting the closure of a dead-end portion of the existing alley system in Square 762 (the
“Application”). Accordingly, please find a completed alley closing application form and retail
displacement form for the Application attached hereto as Tab A. A letter authorizing Holland &
Knight to file and process the Application on behalf of the Applicant is attached hereto as Tab B.
We are transmitting contemporaneously the required filing fee of $2,750.00. The Application is
submitted in accordance with 24 DCMR §§ 1400.4 and 1400.8.
The Applicant is seeking to close a dead-end portion of the existing public alley system in
Square 762 in order to facilitate the renovation and expansion of the historic buildings on the Site.
The portion of the alley system to be closed varies in width, generally between approximately 10
and 12 feet, and is not currently used or relied upon for any transportation purpose. Thus, it is
unnecessary for alley purposes and can be closed pursuant to DC Code § 9-202.01. The proposed
closing is depicted on the sketch attached hereto as Tab C.
As shown on the initial development plans attached hereto as Tab D, the alley closing will
enable the adaptive reuse of the historic buildings on the Site. The Site will be combined into a
single lot of record along with the adjacent property located at 233 Pennsylvania Avenue, SE (Lot
839, Square 762), and the existing historic structures will be connected so as to create a single

building for use by the new ownership. The ground floor will include retail and an entry to the
office space above. The second floor will include office and event space. The third floor will
include event space. The rear of the structure will also house private event space, which will open
into an open courtyard in the center of the newly-combined Site.
The closed public alley will revert to the Applicant as owners of the Site. As shown on the
historical plats attached as Tab E, the Site originally comprised the western part of record Lot 13,
which was divided into four lots as shown on the 1873 plat. In 1887, a portion of the public alley
to be closed was dedicated from the western portion of Lot 13, which resulted in the creation of
Lots 43 through 49 in the square. At some point between 1887 and 1911, the owner of Lot 46
dedicated an additional portion of the alley (± 122.8 square feet), and in 1911, the owner of Lot 45
dedicated the remaining portion of the public alley (± 105 square feet).
The closure of this portion of the public alley system will not disrupt the transportation
system or interfere with access to or from any other properties within the square. Specifically, all
properties that currently have access to a public alley system will continue to have access to the
public alley system. The small portion of the dead-end alley will be combined with the Site, which
also has access from the 20-foot public alley system.
Finally, as required by 24 DCMR § 1400.4(d), a listing of all properties (land and
buildings) associated with the requested alley closing are attached hereto as Tab F.
We would appreciate your processing of the Application at your earliest convenience. If
you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact either of us. Thank you for your attention
to this matter.
Respectfully submitted,
Holland & Knight LLP
_____________________
Christine M. Shiker
Christopher S. Cohen
Attachments
cc: Diana Dorsey Hill
Office of the Surveyor, Program Specialist (via email; w/ attachments)
2
#183341663_v2

TAB A

✔
Closing Portion of Existing Alley System in Square 762
762
Abutting Lots 842, 843, and 823
Clear Plains LLC
771-200-7220
christopher.cohen@hklaw.com
/s/ Christopher S. Cohen
*authorized agent

762
842, 843, 823
X
N/A
N/A
N/A
1/30/2023
Christopher S. Cohen
(authorized representative)
*authorized agent
/s/ Christopher S. Cohen

TAB B

ClearPlains LLC
January20, 2023
Office ofthe SurveyorfortheDistrict ofColumbia
c/o Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Washington, D.C. 20024
Joseph.snider2@dc.gov
Re: Authorization Letter from Applicant
Application forAlleyClosing- Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
This letter serves as authorization for the law firm ofHolland & Knight LLP to represent
Clear Plains LLC in the filing ofthis application to the Office ofthe Surveyor offor the District
ofColumbia. ClearPlains LLC is the ownerofthe property subjectofthis application,
Sincerely,
Clear Plains LLC
A Delaware limited liability company
By: LbovaudCeassine
Name: Edward Corrigan
Title: President
#183473126_vi

TAB C

PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
0843 0842 0839
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
Awning over
Concrete Patio
Fence 1 Story
Addition
1
0
'
0823
1 Story
CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 | 229, 231, 233, 203 Rear | Existing Conditions 10.21.22
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Existing Conditions SquaZre 0.7S62 D.1
washCingOtoRn, Edc a20r0c0h7itecture + design, inc. CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202. 1 46 0 6 1 .6 0 1 w 16 is c o c n or s e i d n c. a c v om e n w @ , c s o u re it d e c 405 ©CORE architecture + design, inc.
Rydin Block ProjectNumber 21046.33
washington,dc 20007
Printed9/20/22
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute
©2022COREarchitecture+design,inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
229 PA AVE SE 231 PA AVE SE 233 PA AVE SE
1 Story
203 Rear 3rd St ST SE

TAB D

Capitol - 1 Block Independence Ave SE
229/231 Pennsylvania Ave SE
Square 0762 Lot 0842/0843
Approximate Lot Size - 3,134 SF
Zoned Mixed-Use (MU-26)
233 Pennsylvania Ave SE
Square 0762 Lot 0839
MU-24
84'-11"
Pennsylvania
Ave
SE
A
Zo
p
n
p
e
ro
d
x
M
im
ix
a
e
te
d -
L
U
o
s
t
e
S
(
i
M
ze
U
-
- 2
2
6
,5
)
00 SF
203 Rear 3rd St SE
Square 0762 Lot 0823
Approximate Lot Size - 2,371 SF
Zoned Mixed-Use (MU-26)
814 sq ft
C st SE C st SE
1” = 50’-0” SCALE AND NORTH ARROW
CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 1
ES
tS
dn2
ES
tS
dn2
ES
tS
dr3
ES
tS
dr3
ES
tS
ht4
ES
tS
ht4
Capitol Lounge Office
PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Restrooms
UP
Beer Cooler
UP UP
DN
-9'-0" (74.5')
Kitchen Prep
Capitol Lounge
Flex Space
Kitchen Storage
CPI Storage/Office
DN
UP Proposed
Subdivision
Existing Alley
UP
-6'-9 1/2" (76.71')
UP
Basement/Cellar .02
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block Project Number 21046.33
Printed 10/20/22
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Three Story Addition at Rear of 229
Pennsylvania Ave SE
Code Modification being Sought to Allow
Additional Egress from 203 to Addition
Three Story Addition at Rear of 231
Pennsylvania Ave SE, Replaces
current One Story Addition.
E|W SECTION
N.I.C
Three Story Addition at Rear of 233 N
Pennsylvania Ave SE
New Addition
N|S SECTION N.I.C
SCALE: 1/16" = 1'-0"

PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
New Bay Projection
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar
ADDITION:
3 Stories + Cellar + Rooftop
ADDITION:
Second Story on
top of Existing
First Level
0" (85.29')
CORE architecture + design, inc. 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 2
Z.SD.2
Proposed Subdivision - Alley Closed
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
Project Number 21046.33
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block
Printed 1/27/23
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Legend
N Properties Included in Application
Adjacent Properties
Square 0762

52'-0"
CORE architecture + design, inc. 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 3
Z.SD.1
Existing Conditions
CORE architecture + design, inc.
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405
Project Number 21046.33
washington, dc 20007 Rydin Block
Printed 1/27/23
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc
Conservative Partnership Institute ©2022 CORE architecture + design, inc.
"4/1
4-'51
PENNSYLVANIA
AVENUE
SE
Existing Bay Projections
SQUARE 0762
0843 0842 0839
3 Stories + Cellar 4 Stories + Cellar
Awning over
Concrete Patio
Fence 1 Story
ROOF ELEV: ELEV: 84.42' Addition
117.5'
s E h x o is w ti n n g in A B ll l e u y e R 11 O 7 O .5 F ' ELEV:
10'
ELEV: 85.11'
ROOF ELEV:
120.04'
0823
1 Story
0" (85.29')
ES
TEERTS
dr3
Property Existing Lot Area Allowable FAR Existing GFA/FAR Proposed GFA
Included with Application
LOT 0843 -
229 Pennsylvania Ave SE 1,477 SF 3,692.5 SF 3,368 SF 4,464 SF
LOT 0842 -
231 Pennsylvania Ave SE 1,692 SF 4,230 SF 4,209 SF 4,440 SF
LOT 0823 -
203 3rd Street SE Rear 2,358 SF 5,895 SF 1,564 SF 3,128 SF
Adjacent Property
LOT 0839 -
233 Pennsylvania Ave SE 2,326 SF 5,815 SF 6,545 SF 7,600 SF
Total for Subdivision 7,853 SF 19,632.5 SF 15,686 SF 19,632 SF
1 Story
Alley approx.1,000 SF approx. 2,500 SF 0 SF 0 SF
Total with Alley 8,853 SF 22,132.5 SF 15,686 SF 19,632 SF
N
Square 0762

CORE architecture + design, inc. Square 0762 | 203 Rear 3rd St and Alley Conditions 01.30.2023
1010 wisconsin ave nw, suite 405 Square 0762
washington, dc 20007 CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
202.466.6116 coredc.com @coredc ©CORE architecture + design, inc. 4

.14
COCROE RarEch aitercchtuirtee c+t uderesi g+n ,d inecs.ign, inc. Square 0C7ou6r2ty a|r dB Buiridldseinyeg P Aerdspdeicttiiovens 01.30.2023
10110 0w1is0co wnsisinc aovne sniwn, asuviete n4w05, suite 405 Square 0762
Project Number 21046.33
waswhiangsthonin, gdcto 2n0,0 d0c7 20007 Rydin Block CONSERVATIVE PARTNERSHIP
Printed 9/15/22
2022.40626..6416166 . 6 1co1r6ed c . c ocmo r e d@cc.ocroemdc @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute ©CORE arc©h2it0e2c2t uCrOeR +E adrechsiitgecnt,u rien c+. d esig5n, inc.

.10
COCROE RarEch aitercchtuirtee c+t uderesi g+n ,d inecs.ign, inc. Square 0762 | 229, 231, 233P ePnensnlnyvsaynliav aAvnei aS EAve SE Exterior Improvements 01.30.2023
10110 0w1is0co wnsisinc aovne sniwn, asuviete n4w05, suite 405 Square 0762
waswhiangsthonin, gdcto 2n0,0 d0c7 20007 at SRtyrdien Belotck Face CONSERVATIVE P P A ro R je T c N t N E u R m S be H r IP 21046.33
Printed 9/15/22
2022.40626..6416166 . 6 1co1r6ed c . c ocmo r e d@cc.ocroemdc @coredc Conservative Partnership Institute ©CORE arc©h2it0e2c2t uCrOeR +E adrechsiitgecnt,u rien c+. d esig6n, inc.

TAB E

(Page 1 of 1)

(Page 1 of 1)

(Page 1 of 1)

(Page 1 of 1)

(Page 1 of 1)

(Page
1
of
1)

TAB F

Application for Alley Closing
Northeast Portion of Square 762
Tab F
Listing of Associated Properties
 Square 762, Lot 823
Current Owner: Clear Plains LLC
 Square 762, Lot 842
Current Owner: Clear Plains LLC
 Square 762, Lot 823
Current Owner: Clear Plains LLC
#183622085_v1

ClearPlains LLC
January20, 2023
Office ofthe SurveyorfortheDistrict ofColumbia
c/o Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Washington, D.C. 20024
Joseph.snider2@dc.gov
Re: Authorization Letter from Applicant
Application forAlleyClosing- Square 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
This letter serves as authorization for the law firm ofHolland & Knight LLP to represent
Clear Plains LLC in the filing ofthis application to the Office ofthe Surveyor offor the District
ofColumbia. ClearPlains LLC is the ownerofthe property subjectofthis application,
Sincerely,
Clear Plains LLC
A Delaware limited liability company
By: LbovaudCeassine
Name: Edward Corrigan
Title: President
#183473126_vi

May 16, 2024
Mr. Joseph E. Snider, DC Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor
DC Department of Buildings
1100 4th Street, SW,
Washington, DC 20024
VIA: Email
RE: S.O. 23-01974 - Alley Closing in Sq. 762
Dear Mr. Snider:
At a regularly scheduled, properly noticed, meeting on May 14, 2024, with
a quorum present, Advisory Neighborhood Commission (ANC) 6B voted
(5-1-2) to send this letter to you regarding the above referenced matter.
After evaluating the matter and consulting the community we have found
that the portion of the alley proposed to be closed is no longer used for alley
purposes. Therefore, we support the applicant’s request to close the alley.
Please contact Frank D’Andrea, Chair of ANC 6B’s Planning and Zoning
Committee at 6b04@anc.dc.gov if you have questions or need further
information.
Respectfully,
Edward Ryder
Chair, ANC 6B
Cc:
Charles Allen, Ward 6 Councilmember
Katie Mitchell, Chief of Staff, Ward 6 Councilmember
Christine Shiker, Counsel for Applicant
Christopher Cohen, Counsel for Applicant
Frank D’Andrea, Chair ANC 6B Planning and Zoning Committee
Jerry Sroufe, SMD 6B02
1 | Pa ge
*Please note that the ANC 6B mailing address has changed as of January 2023

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 23, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Closing of the Northeast Portion of an Alley
in Square 762, S.O. 23-01974, Act of 2025
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September
22, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The bill approves the closure of a portion of the alley located within the block bounded by 2nd Street,
S.E., Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., 3rd Street, S.E., and C Street, S.E. The alley portion considered for
closure is located in the northeast corner of the block, behind 229 and 231 Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.1
This portion of the alley system is no longer needed for transportation purposes.
An entity, which controls four2 of the abutting properties, plans to incorporate the alley space into a
larger redevelopment and subdivision. The applicant will rehabilitate historic buildings and combine
the four properties into one lot, creating a single building comprising retail, office, and event spaces.
1 The alley portion to be closed abuts the properties known for assessment and tax purposes as Square 762,
Lots 823, 839, 842, 843, and 58.
2 The alley closure application includes the properties known for assessment and tax purposes as Square 762,
Lots 823, 839, 842, and 843.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Closing of the Northeast Portion of an Alley in Square 726, S.O. 23-01974, Act of 2025,” Draft Bill as
provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 22, 2025
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. There are no costs to the District associated with the alley closure. The alley
property will become taxable to the combined property once the closure is approved and the project
begins.3 As a condition of the closure, the applicant will pay for the relocation of Verizon
infrastructure located within the alley.
3 The entire alley portion to be closed will revert to the property known for assessment and tax purposes as
Square 762, Lot 842.
Page 2 of 2